Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.070

Disclosure of records prohibited—Exceptions.

The secretary of state may not make any records in a program participant's file available for inspection or copying, other than the address designated by the secretary of state, except under the following circumstances:

(1) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency; and

(a) The participant's application contains no indication that he or she has been a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking perpetrated by a law enforcement employee; and

(b) The request is in accordance with official law enforcement duties and is in writing on official law enforcement letterhead stationery and signed by the law enforcement agency's chief officer, or his or her designee; or

(2) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order; and

(a) The request is made by a nonlaw enforcement agency; or

(b) The participant's file indicates he or she has reason to believe he or she is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking perpetrated by a law enforcement employee.

(3) To the Washington state patrol solely for the use authorized in RCW 80.36.570, provided that participant information must clearly distinguish between those participants requesting disclosure to a law enforcement agency of the location of a telecommunications device and call information of the user, and those participants who request nondisclosure to a law enforcement agency of the location of a telecommunications device and call information of the user. The Washington state patrol may not use the information or make the information available for inspection and copying for any other purpose than authorized in RCW 80.36.570. The secretary of state may adopt rules to make available the information required for the purposes of this section and RCW 80.36.570. The secretary of state and the secretary of state's officers, employees, or custodian, are not liable, nor shall a cause of action exist, for any loss or damage based upon the release of information, or the nondisclosure of information, from the address confidentiality program to the Washington state patrol if the agency, officer, employee, or custodian acted in good faith in attempting to comply with the provisions of this section and RCW 80.36.570.

[ 2015 c 190 s 2; 2008 c 18 s 5; 1999 c 53 s 1; 1998 c 138 s 3; 1991 c 23 s 7.]

NOTES:

Short title—2015 c 190: See note following RCW 80.36.570.

Effective date—1999 c 53: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 20, 1999]." [ 1999 c 53 s 2.]